Utah statutes.
57-14-4.   Use of private land without charge -- Effect.

(1)  Except as provided in Subsection 57-14-6(1), an owner of land who either directly or indirectly invites or permits without charge or for a nominal fee of not more than $1 per year any person to use the land for any recreational purpose, or an owner of a public access area open to public recreational access under Title 73, Chapter 29, Public Waters Access Act, does not thereby:

(a)  make any representation or extend any assurance that the premises are safe for any purpose;

(b)  confer upon the person the legal status of an invitee or licensee to whom a duty of care is owed;

(c)  assume responsibility for or incur liability for any injury to persons or property caused by an act or omission of the person or any other person who enters upon the land; or

(d)  owe any duty to curtail the owner's use of his land during its use for recreational purposes.

(2)  This section applies to the relationship between an owner of land and a trespasser.

